Nebraska, session 109, LB975.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB975 LB975
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Private Attorney Retention Sunshine Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds that in order to increase
transparency and accountability of taxpayer dollars and in order to
establish uniformity among state agencies for the provision of contract
services, including legal services, the Legislature adopts the Private
Attorney Retention Sunshine Act. The act will ensure that if state
litigation is delegated to private attorneys, government lawsuits will be
prosecuted in a manner to further the public interest rather than to
increase the profitability of private attorneys. Taxpayers deserve
oversight and accountability when state contracts for legal services are
executed to ensure an open, transparent, and competitive public bidding
process. Additionally, taxpayers deserve a mechanism for oversight and
accountability regarding contracts for legal services and components such
as expenses, the fee agreement, and other record keeping should be
disclosed upon completion of the contract.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Private Attorney Retention Sunshine
Act, a contract for legal services exceeding ten thousand dollars means a
contract in which the fee paid to a private attorney or law firm whether
a flat, hourly, or contingent fee, and expenses, exceeds or can
reasonably be expected to exceed ten thousand dollars.
Sec. 4. (1) The Attorney General shall not retain a private
attorney or law firm to perform legal services on behalf of the state
until an open and competitive bidding process has been completed
consistent with the requirements set forth in section 73-807.
(2)(a) When executing a contract for legal services exceeding ten
thousand dollars, the Attorney General shall file the proposed contract
with the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature, if the Legislature
is in session, or with the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, if
the Legislature is not in session.
(b) Within ten days after the filing, the committee or executive
-2-

LB975 LB975
2026 2026
board shall hold a public hearing on the proposed contract and thereafter
issue a report to the Attorney General. The report shall include any
changes to the proposed contract approved by the committee or executive
board. The Attorney General shall review the report and adopt a proposed
final contract taking into consideration the committee's or executive
board's findings and shall file the proposed final contract with the
committee or executive board.
(c) If the proposed final contract does not contain the changes
proposed by the committee or executive board, the Attorney General shall
include an explanation of the reasons for the omission of the proposed
changes, including any exigent circumstances, with the proposed final
contract. No earlier than thirty days after sending the proposed final
contract and any explanation to the committee or executive board, the
Attorney General may execute the final contract.
Sec. 5. (1) At the conclusion of a legal proceeding for which a
private attorney or law firm has been retained on a contingent-fee basis,
the private attorney or law firm shall provide the Attorney General with
a statement of the hours worked, expenses incurred, the aggregate fee
amount, and a breakdown of the hourly rate, calculated based on hours
worked divided by the amount of the fee recovered, minus expenses.
(2) The state shall not incur legal fees greater than one thousand
dollars per hour for legal services rendered. If a disclosure submitted
in accordance with this section indicates an hourly rate in excess of one
thousand dollars per hour, the rate shall be reduced to one thousand
dollars per hour.
Sec. 6. The Private Attorney Retention Sunshine Act applies to
contracts between private attorneys and the Attorney General executed on
or after the effective date of this act.
Sec. 7. The Private Attorney Retention Sunshine Act shall not be
construed to expand the authority of the Attorney General to execute a
contract if no such authority otherwise exists.
-3-

LB975 LB975
2026 2026
Sec. 8. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
-4-